Utah statutes.
53A-25b-501.   Instructional Materials Access Center -- Board to make rules.
(1)  The Utah State Office of Education shall collaborate with the Utah
Schools for the Deaf and the Blind, school districts, and charter schools in
establishing the Utah State Instructional Materials Access Center to provide
students with print disabilities access to instructional materials in
alternate formats in a timely manner.
(2)  The board shall make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, to:
(a)  establish the Utah State Instructional Materials Access Center;
(b)  define how the Educational Resource Center at the Utah Schools for the
Deaf and the Blind shall collaborate in the operation of the Utah State
Instructional Materials Access Center;
(c)  specify procedures for the operation of the Utah State Instructional
Materials Access Center, including procedures to:
(i)  identify students who qualify for instructional materials in alternate
formats; and
(ii)  distribute and store instructional materials in alternate formats;
(d)  establish the contribution of school districts and charter schools
towards the cost of instructional materials in alternate formats; and
(e)  require textbook publishers, as a condition of contract, to provide
electronic file sets in conformance with the National Instructional Materials
Accessibility Standard.
